Idaho statutes. Title 40 HIGHWAYS AND BRIDGES
Chapter 13 HIGHWAY DISTRICTS
§ 40-1337. Classification and retention of records.

Highway district records shall be classified as follows:

“Permanent records” shall consist of, but not be limited to, the following: proceedings of the governing body, ordinances, resolutions, bond register, warrant register, budget records, general ledger, cash books, right-of-way use permits and records affecting the title to real property or liens thereon, and other documents or records as may be deemed of permanent nature by the highway district board of commissioners.

“Semipermanent records” shall consist of, but not be limited to, the following: claims, contracts, cancelled checks, warrants, duplicate warrants, purchase orders, vouchers, duplicate receipts, bonds and coupons, registration and other election records, financial records and other documents or records as may be deemed of semipermanent nature by the board of highway district commissioners.

“Temporary records” shall consist of, but not be limited to, the following: correspondence not related to subsections (1) and (2) of this section, cash receipts subject to audit, and other records as may be deemed temporary by the board of highway district commissioners.

Those records not included in subsection (1)(a), (1)(b) or (1)(c) of this section may be classified as permanent, semipermanent or temporary by the board of highway district commissioners.

Highway district records shall be retained as follows:

Permanent records shall be retained for not less than ten (10) years.

Semipermanent records shall be kept for not less than five (5) years after date of issuance or completion of the matter contained within the record.

Temporary records shall be retained for not less than two (2) years.

§ 40-1337A. Photographic or digital storage and use of highway district records.

A highway district official may reproduce and retain documents in a photographic, digital or other nonpaper medium. The medium in which a document is retained shall accurately reproduce the document in paper form during the period for which the document must be retained and shall preclude unauthorized alteration of the document.

If the medium chosen for retention is photographic, all film used must meet the quality standards of the American national standards institute (ANSI).

If the medium chosen for retention is digital, the medium must provide for reproduction on paper at a resolution of at least two hundred (200) dots per inch.

A document retained by the highway district in any form or medium permitted under this section shall be deemed an original public record for all purposes. A reproduction or copy of such a document, certified by the highway district official, shall be deemed to be a transcript or certified copy of the original and shall be admissible before any court or administrative hearing.

Once a paper document is retained in a nonpaper medium as authorized by this section, the original paper document may be disposed of or returned to the sender.

Whenever any record is reproduced by photographic or digital process as herein provided, it shall be made in duplicate, and the custodian thereof shall place one (1) copy in a fire-resistant vault, or off-site storage facility, and he shall retain the other copy in his office with suitable equipment for displaying such record at not less than original size and for making copies of the record.

A highway district may incorporate an electronic version of another agreement by reference into a contract, if:

The unsigned terms are stored in accordance with the provisions of this section;

The signed contract contains a prominently displayed notification of the incorporation by reference; and

The unsigned terms are readily available for inspection by the parties.

§ 40-1305AA. Initiating recall proceedings — Statement — Contents — Verification — Definitions. [Repealed.]

§ 40-1333. Cities — Highway responsibility.